Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 44.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201469-2304
Notice; statement
required.

A notice given pursuant to section 69-2303
shall contain one of the following statements, as appropriate:

(1) "If you fail to reclaim the property, it will be sold
at a public sale after notice of the sale has been given by publication. You
have the right to bid on the property at this sale. After the property is
sold and the costs of storage, advertising, and sale are deducted, the remaining
money will be turned over to the State Treasurer pursuant to the Uniform Disposition
of Unclaimed Property Act. You may claim the remaining money from the office
of the State Treasurer as provided in such act."; or

(2) "Because this property is believed to be worth less than one thousand dollars, it may
be kept, sold, or destroyed without further notice if you fail to reclaim
it within the time indicated in this notice.".

Laws 1991, LB 36, § 4;

Laws 2010, LB712, § 44.

Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act, see section 69-1329.